Mississippi, session 2026, HB705.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF MISSISSIPPI: SECTION 1. The court shall provide an enhanced imprisonment penalty of no less than one (1) year, but no more than two (2) years in the custody of the Department of Corrections for any person who wore a facial mask, hood or other item that fully or partially concealed his or her face during commission of the crime for which he or she is being sentenced. SECTION 2.  This act shall take effect and be in force from and after July 1, 2026.